Colorado statutes. TITLE 5 Consumer Credit Code
ARTICLE 16 COLORADO FAIR DEBT COLLECTION PRACTICES ACT
5-16-115. License - registration - unlawful acts.

It is unlawful for any person to:

Conduct the business of a collection agency or advertise or solicit, either in print, by letter, in person, or otherwise, the right to make collection or obtain payment of any debt on behalf of another without having obtained a license under this article 16; or

Conduct the business of a collection agency under any name other than that under which licensed.

It is unlawful for a person to act as a collections manager without having complied with sections 5-16-119 and 5-16-122.

It is unlawful for any person to employ a person as a solicitor, collections manager, or debt collector under this article 16 without complying with this section.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1238), ch. 260, p. 1092, § 1, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-14-115 as it existed prior to 2017.

5-16-116. Collection agency board - created. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire section repealed, (SB 17-216), ch. 285, p. 1579, § 6, effective June 1; entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1238), ch. 260, p. 1092, § 1, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section was numbered as § 12-14-116 in SB 17-216 (see L. 2017, p. 1579). The repeal of that provision was harmonized with this section as it appears in HB 17-1238.

5-16-117. Powers and duties of the administrator.

Repealed.

The administrator is authorized to approve or deny any application submitted pursuant to this article 16 and to issue any license authorized by this article 16.

Any complaint received by the administrator regarding violations of this article 16 by an attorney shall be forwarded to the supreme court's attorney regulation counsel.

The administrator shall enforce the provisions of article 17 of this title 5 pursuant to section 5-17-111.

to (8) Repealed.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1238), ch. 260, p. 1093, § 1, effective August 9; (1) repealed and (5), (6), (7), and (8) added, (SB 17-216), ch. 285, p. 1579, § 7, effective January 1, 2018.

5-16-118. Collection agency license - required.

Any person acting as a collection agency must possess a valid license issued by the administrator in accordance with this article 16 and any rules adopted pursuant thereto.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1238), ch. 260, p. 1093, § 1, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-14-118 as it existed prior to 2017.

5-16-119. Collection agency license - requirements - application - fee - expiration.

As requisites for licensure, an applicant for a collection agency license shall:

Be owned by, or employ as collections manager or an executive officer of the agency, at least one individual who has been engaged in a responsible position in an established collection agency for a period of at least two years.

Notwithstanding the requirements of subsection (1)(a)(I) of this section, the administrator may substitute other business experience for requirements where the business experience has provided comparable experience in collections.

Employ a collections manager who shall be responsible for the actions of the debt collectors in that office.

The collections manager may be the same individual specified in subsection (1)(a) of this section if the collections manager also meets the qualifications of subsection (1)(a) of this section.

File a bond in the amount and manner specified in section 5-16-124;

If a foreign corporation, comply fully with the laws of this state to entitle it to do business within the state.

Each applicant for a collection agency license shall submit an application providing all information in the form and manner the administrator shall designate, including, but not limited to:

The location, ownership, and, if applicable, the previous history of the business and the name, address, age, and relevant debt-collection experience of each of the principals of the business;

A duly verified financial statement for the previous year;

If a corporation, the name of the shareholder and the number of shares held by any shareholder owning ten percent or more of the stock; and

For the principals and the collections manager of the applicant:

The conviction of any felony or the acceptance by a court of competent jurisdiction of a plea of guilty or nolo contendere to any felony;

The denial, revocation, or suspension of any license issued to any collection agency that employed or was owned by such persons, in whole or in part, directly or indirectly, and a statement of their position and authority at the collection agency:

For any license issued pursuant to this article 16; or

For any comparable license issued by any other jurisdiction;

The taking of any other disciplinary or adverse action or the existence of any outstanding complaints against any collection agency which employed or was owned in whole or in part, directly or indirectly, by such persons, and a statement of their position and authority at the collection agency:

For any license issued pursuant to this article 16; or

When the action was taken by any other jurisdiction or the complaint exists in any other jurisdiction, whether or not a license was issued by that jurisdiction;

The suspension or termination of approval of any collections manager under this article 16 or any other disciplinary or adverse action taken against the applicant, principal, or collections manager in any jurisdiction.

At the time the application is submitted, the applicant shall pay a nonrefundable investigation fee in an amount to be determined by the administrator.

When the administrator approves the application, the applicant shall pay a nonrefundable license fee in an amount to be determined by the administrator.

The administrator shall establish procedures for the maintenance of license lists and the establishment of initial and renewal license fees and schedules. The administrator may change the renewal date of any license issued pursuant to this article 16 to the end that approximately the same number of licenses are scheduled for renewal in each month of the year. Where any renewal date is changed, the fee for the license shall be proportionately increased or decreased, as the case may be. Every licensee shall pay the administrator a license fee to be determined and collected pursuant to section 5-16-121 and subsection (4) of this section, and shall obtain a license certificate for the current license period. Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, a licensee, at any time, may voluntarily surrender the license to the administrator to be cancelled, but such surrender shall not affect the licensee's liability for violations of this article 16 that occurred prior to the date of surrender.

A collection agency must obtain a license for its principal place of business, but its branch offices, if any, need not obtain separate licenses. A collection agency with branch offices must notify the administrator in writing of the location of each branch office within thirty days after the branch office commences business.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1238), ch. 260, p. 1093, § 1, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-14-119 as it existed prior to 2017.

5-16-120. License - issuance - grounds for denial - appeal - contents.

Upon the approval of the license application by the administrator and the satisfaction of all application requirements, the administrator shall issue the applicant a license to operate as a collection agency.

The administrator may deny any application for a license or its renewal if any grounds exist that would justify disciplinary action under section 5-16-127, for failure to meet the requirements of section 5-16-119, or if the applicant, the applicant's principals, or the applicant's collections manager have fraudulently obtained or attempted to obtain a license.

If any application for a license or its renewal is denied, the applicant may appeal the decision pursuant to section 24-4-104.

The license shall state the name of the licensee, location by street and number or office building and room number, city, county, and state where the licensee has his or her principal place of business, together with the number and date of the license and the date of expiration of the license, and shall further state that it is issued pursuant to this article 16 and that the licensee is duly authorized under this article 16.

The administrator may deny any application for a license or its renewal if the collection agency has failed to perform the duties enumerated in section 5-16-123.

The administrator may deny any application for a license or its renewal if the collection agency does not have a positive net worth.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1238), ch. 260, p. 1095, § 1, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-14-120 as it existed prior to 2017.

5-16-121. Collection agency license - renewals.

Each licensee shall make an application to renew its license in the form and manner prescribed by the administrator. The application shall be accompanied by a nonrefundable renewal fee in an amount determined by the administrator.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1238), ch. 260, p. 1096, § 1, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-14-121 as it existed prior to 2017.

5-16-122. Collection agency license - notification of change and reapplication requirements.

Upon any of the following changes, the licensee shall notify the administrator in writing of the change within thirty days after its occurrence:

Change of business name or address;

If a corporation or limited liability company, change in ownership of ten or more percent but less than fifty percent of the corporate stock or ownership interest.

If the licensee fails to provide written notification, the license shall automatically expire on the thirtieth day following the change.

Upon any of the changes specified in subsection (2)(c) of this section, the licensee shall apply for a new license within thirty days of the change. The administrator shall have twenty-five days to review the application and issue or deny the new license. If the administrator denies the license, the administrator shall provide to the licensee a written statement stating why the application for the license was denied, and the licensee shall have fifteen days to cure any defects in the application. The administrator shall approve or deny the resubmitted application within fifteen days.

If the licensee fails to file an application for a new license, the license shall expire on the thirtieth day following the change that necessitated the new license application. If the application is denied and the licensee fails to resubmit the application within fifteen days of the denial, the license shall expire on the fifteenth day following the denial.

The changes that require a new license application are:

In a sole proprietorship or partnership, any change in the persons owning the collection agency;

In a corporation or limited liability company, any change of ownership of fifty percent or more of the stock or ownership interest in any one transaction or a cumulative change of ownership of fifty percent or more from the date of the issuance of the license or from the date of the latest renewal of the license;

Any change of ownership structure, including but not limited to a change to or from a sole proprietorship, partnership, limited liability company, or corporation. No investigation fee shall be required in the event of a change and the application required may be more abbreviated than that required for an initial license, as determined by the administrator.

Upon a change of collections manager, the licensee shall notify the administrator in the form and manner designated by the administrator. The licensee shall appoint a new collections manager within thirty days of the change.

The administrator, within fifteen days, shall approve or disapprove the qualifications of the new collections manager.

The licensee may continue to operate as a collection agency unless and until the administrator disapproves the qualifications of the new collections manager.

Any licensee which has submitted an application for a new license may continue to operate as a collection agency until the final decision of the administrator.

The licensee may appeal the final decision of the administrator pursuant to section 24-4-104.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1238), ch. 260, p. 1096, § 1, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-14-122 as it existed prior to 2017.

5-16-123. Duties of collection agencies.

A licensee shall:

Maintain, at all times, liquid assets in the form of deposit accounts in the total sum of not less than two thousand five hundred dollars more than all sums due and owing to all of its clients;

Maintain, at all times, an office within this state that is open to the public during normal business hours, is staffed by at least one full-time employee, keeps a record of all money collected and remitted by the agency for residents of Colorado, and accepts payments physically made at the office for any debt the agency is attempting to collect.
(b) (I) (A) Maintain, at all times, an office within this state that is open to the public during normal business hours, is staffed by at least one full-time employee, keeps a record of all money collected and remitted by the agency for residents of Colorado, and accepts payments physically made at the office for any debt the agency is attempting to collect.

Notify, in each written communication, the consumer from whom the agency is attempting to collect a debt of the address and telephone number of the local office required by this subsection (1)(b)(I).

Maintain, at all times, a toll-free telephone number that shall be available to any consumer who needs to make a toll call to reach the licensee in connection with a debt.

Maintain, at all times, a trust account for the benefit of its clients that contains, at all times, sufficient funds to pay all sums due or owing to all of its clients. The licensee shall maintain the trust account in a commercial bank or savings and loan association account in this state or accessible in a branch in this state until disbursed to the creditor. The account must be clearly designated as a trust account and shall be used only for such purposes and not as an operating account. A deposit of all funds received to a trust account followed by a transfer of the agency share of the collection to an operating account is not a violation of this section.

Within thirty days after the last day of the month in which any collections are made for a client, account to the client for all collections made during that month and remit to the client all money owed to the client pursuant to the agreement between the client and the collection agency;

Upon written demand of the administrator, within five days of receipt of the demand, produce a complete set of all form notices or form letters used by the licensee in the collection of accounts;

Be responsible, pursuant to this article 16, for violations of this article 16 caused by its collections manager, debt collectors, or solicitors.

No collection agency shall employ any collections manager, debt collector, or solicitor who has been convicted of or who has entered a plea of guilty or nolo contendere to any crime specified in part 4 of article 4, in part 1, 2, 3, 5, 7, or 9 of article 5, or in article 5.5 of title 18, or any similar crime under the jurisdiction of any federal court or court of another state.

No collection agency shall be owned or operated by the following persons who have been convicted of or who have entered a plea of guilty or nolo contendere to any crime specified in part 4 of article 4, in part 1, 2, 3, 5, 7, or 9 of article 5, or in article 5.5 of title 18, or any similar crime under the jurisdiction of any federal court or court of another state:

The owner of a sole proprietorship;

A partner of a partnership;

A member of a limited liability company; or

An officer or director of a corporation.

Subsections (1)(a), (1)(c), and (1)(d) of this section do not apply to a person collecting or attempting to collect a debt owned by the person collecting or attempting to collect the debt.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1238), ch. 260, p. 1097, § 1, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-14-123 as it existed prior to 2017.

5-16-124. Bond - definition.

Each licensee shall maintain at all times and each applicant shall file, prior to the issuance of any license to the applicant, a bond in the sum of twelve thousand dollars plus an additional two thousand dollars for each ten thousand dollars or part thereof by which the average monthly sums remitted or owed to all of its clients during the previous year exceed fifteen thousand dollars; or, in the alternative, an applicant or licensee shall present evidence of a savings account, deposit, or certificate of deposit of the same sum and meeting the requirements of section 11-35-101. The total amount of the bond shall not exceed twenty thousand dollars and shall be in favor of the attorney general of the state of Colorado for use of the people of the state of Colorado and the administrator. The bond shall be executed by the applicant or licensee as principal and by a corporation that is licensed by the commissioner of insurance to transact the business of fidelity and surety insurance as surety. If any such surety, during the life of the bond, cancels the bond or reduces the penal sum of the bond, the surety immediately shall notify the administrator in writing. The administrator shall give notice to the licensee that the bond has been cancelled or reduced and that the licensee's license shall automatically expire unless a new or increased bond with proper sureties is filed within thirty days after the date the administrator received the notice, or on a later date as is stated in the surety's notice.

The bond shall include a condition that the licensee shall, upon demand in writing made by the administrator, pay over to the administrator for the use of any client from whom any debt is taken or received for collection by the licensee the proceeds of the collection, less the charges for collection in accordance with the terms of the agreement made between the licensee and the client.

A client may file with the administrator a duly verified claim as to money due the client for money collected by a licensee. If the administrator makes a preliminary determination that a claim meets the requirements of this section, the administrator shall make a demand for the amount claimed. The demand may be made on the licensee, the surety, or both.

If a receiver has been appointed by any court of competent jurisdiction in the state of Colorado to take charge of the assets of any licensee, the receiver, upon the written consent of the administrator, may demand and receive payment on the bond from the surety and, upon order of the court, may bring suit upon the bond in the name of the receiver, without joining the administrator as a party to the action.

If a client has filed a duly verified claim with the administrator, who has refused to make demand upon the licensee or surety, the client may bring suit against the licensee or surety on the bond for the recovery of money due from the licensee without assignment of the bond to the client. Nothing in this section shall preclude a client from making a demand on both the licensee and the surety.

The bond shall include a condition that the licensee shall, upon written demand, turn over to the client any and all notes, valuable papers, or evidence of indebtedness which may have been deposited with the licensee by the client, but the licensee shall not be required to return any such papers, notes, or evidence of indebtedness on debts in process of collection, unless reimbursed by the client for the services performed on the debt so evidenced.

"Debts in process of collection" means any debts that have been in the licensee's hands for less than nine months, debts on which payments are being made, or on which payments have been promised, debts on which suit has been brought, and claims that have been forwarded to any other collection agency or attorney.

The bond shall cover all matters placed with the licensee during the term of the license granted and any renewal, except as provided in this section. Such bond may be enforced in the manner described in this section, by a receiver appointed to take charge of the assets of any licensee, or by any client if the administrator refuses to act. The aggregate liability of the surety, for any and all claims that may arise under the bond, shall not exceed the penalty of the bond.

Any licensee, at any time, may file a new bond with the administrator. Any surety may file with the administrator notice of withdrawal as surety on the bond of any licensee. Upon filing of a new bond or on expiration of thirty days after the filing of notice of withdrawal as surety by the surety, the liability of the former surety for all future acts of the licensee shall terminate, except as provided in subsection (9) of this section. The administrator shall cancel the bond given by any surety company upon being advised its license to transact the business of fidelity and surety insurance has been revoked by the commissioner of insurance and shall notify the licensee.

No action shall be brought upon any bond required to be given and filed, after the expiration of two years from the surrender, revocation, or expiration of the license issued thereunder. After the expiration of two years, all liability of the surety upon the bond shall cease if no action has been commenced upon the bond before the expiration of the period.

In lieu of an individual surety bond, the administrator may authorize a blanket bond covering qualifying licensees in the sum of two million dollars in favor of the attorney general of the state of Colorado for use of the people of the state of Colorado and the administrator. Each new and renewal applicant shall pay a fee in an amount determined by the administrator to offset the applicant's share of the blanket bond. Conditions and procedures regarding the bond shall be as set forth in this section for individual bonds.

This section does not apply to a person collecting or attempting to collect a debt owned by the person collecting or attempting to collect the debt.

A bond shall not be required of a debt buyer as long as the debt buyer does not also provide third-party debt collection.

Source:

L. 2017:

(12) added, (SB 17-216), ch. 285, p. 1581, § 8, effective June 1; entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1238), ch. 260, p. 1098, § 1, effective August 9.

5-16-125. Unlawful acts.

In addition to the unlawful acts specified in sections 5-16-112 and 5-16-115, it is unlawful and a violation of this article 16 for any person:

To refuse or fail to comply with section 5-16-104, 5-16-105, 5-16-106, 5-16-107, 5-16-108, 5-16-109, 5-16-110, 5-16-118, 5-16-119 (1), or 5-16-123 (1)(b) to (1)(e) or (2);

To aid or abet any person operating or attempting to operate in violation of this article 16, including but not limited to section 5-16-115; except that nothing in this article 16 shall prevent any licensed collection agency from accepting, as forwardee, claims for collection from any collection agency or attorney whose place of business is outside this state;

To recover or attempt to recover treble damages for any check, draft, or order not paid on presentment without complying with the provisions of section 13-21-109.

It is unlawful and a violation of this article 16 for any licensee or any attorney representing a licensee to invoke a cognovit clause in any note so as to confess judgment.

It is unlawful and a violation of this article 16 for any licensee to render or to advertise that it will render legal services; except that a licensee may solicit claims for collection and take assignments and pursue the collection thereof subject to the provisions of law concerning the unauthorized practice of law.

It is unlawful and a violation of this article 16 for any licensee, collections manager, debt collector, or solicitor to:

Refuse or fail to comply with a rule adopted pursuant to this article 16 or any lawful order of the administrator; or

Aid or abet any person in such refusal or failure.

It is unlawful and a violation of this article 16 for any person to falsify any information or make any misleading statements in any application authorized under this article 16.

Any officer or agent of a corporation who personally participates in any violation of this article 16 shall be subject to the penalties prescribed in section 5-16-126 for individuals.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1238), ch. 260, p. 1100, § 1, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-14-128 as it existed prior to 2017.

5-16-125.5. Statute of limitations - actions by administrator.

An action or proceeding brought by the administrator pursuant to this article 16 or pursuant to any rule issued by the administrator under this article 16 must be brought within two years after the date on which the violation occurred.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire section added, (SB 17-216), ch. 285, p. 1581, § 9, effective June 1.

Editor's note:

This section was numbered as § 12-14-128.5 in SB 17-216 (see L. 2017, p. 1581). That provision was relocated and harmonized with this article as it appears in HB 17-1238.

5-16-126. Criminal penalties.

Any person who violates any provision of section 5-16-125 (1), (2), (3), or (4) commits a class 1 misdemeanor and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-501.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1238), ch. 260, p. 1101, § 1, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-14-129 as it existed prior to 2017.

5-16-127. Complaint - investigations - powers of administrator - sanctions.

Upon filing with the administrator by any interested person a written complaint charging any person with a violation of this article 16, any rule adopted pursuant to this article 16, or any lawful order of the administrator, the administrator shall conduct an investigation.

For reasonable cause, the administrator may, on its own motion, conduct an investigation of the conduct of any person concerning compliance with this article 16. The administrator may also issue subpoenas to require the attendance of witnesses or the production of documents. The subpoenas may be issued to any person, whether located in this state or elsewhere, who has engaged in or is engaging in any violation of this article 16. The administrator may also administer oaths; conduct hearings in aid of any investigation or inquiry necessary to administer the provisions of this article 16; and apply to the appropriate court for an appropriate order to effect the purposes of this article 16.

If any licensee or one of its principals or collections managers is convicted of or enters a plea of guilty or nolo contendere to any crime specified in part 4 of article 4, in part 1, 2, 3, 5, 7, or 9 of article 5, or in article 5.5 of title 18, or any similar crime under the jurisdiction of any federal court or court of another state, the conviction or plea shall constitute grounds for disciplinary action under this section.

In any proceeding held under this section, the administrator may accept as prima facie evidence of grounds for disciplinary or adverse action any disciplinary or adverse action taken against a licensee, the licensee's principals, debt collector, solicitor, or collections manager by another jurisdiction that issues professional, occupational, or business licenses, if the conduct that prompted the disciplinary or adverse action by that jurisdiction would be grounds for disciplinary action under this section.

For reasonable cause, the administrator or the administrator's designee has the right, during normal business hours without resort to subpoena, to examine the books, records, and files of any licensee. If the books, records, and files are located outside Colorado, the licensee shall bear all expenses in making them available.

For reasonable cause, the administrator may require the making and filing, by any licensee, at any time, of a written, verified statement of the licensee's assets and liabilities, including, if requested, a detailed statement of amounts due claimants. The administrator may also require an audited statement when cause has been shown that an audited statement is needed.

Any financial statement of any applicant or licensee required to be filed with the administrator shall not be a public record but may be introduced in evidence in any court action or in any administrative action involving the applicant or licensee.

For the purpose of any proceeding under this article 16, the administrator may subpoena witnesses and compel them to give testimony under oath. If any subpoenaed witness fails or refuses to appear or testify, the subpoenaing authority may petition the district court, and, upon proper showing, the court may order the witness to appear and testify. Disobedience of the order of court may be punished as a contempt of court.

The administrator may appoint an administrative law judge pursuant to part 10 of article 30 of title 24 to conduct any proceedings authorized under this article 16.

If the administrator finds cause to believe a licensee or collections manager has violated this article 16, the rules adopted pursuant to this article 16, or any lawful order of the administrator, the administrator shall notify the licensee or collections manager and hold a hearing. Any proceedings conducted pursuant to this section shall be in accordance with article 4 of title 24.

If the administrator or the administrative law judge finds that the licensee or collections manager has violated this article 16, the rules adopted pursuant to this article 16, or any lawful order of the administrator, or if the licensee fraudulently obtained a license, the administrator may issue letters of admonition; deny, revoke, or suspend the license of the licensee or approval of the collections manager; place the licensee or collections manager on probation; or impose administrative fines in an amount up to one thousand five hundred dollars per violation on the licensee or collections manager.

The administrator may issue letters of admonition pursuant to subsection (10)(a) of this section without a hearing; except that the licensee or collections manager receiving the letter of admonition may request a hearing before the administrator to appeal the issuance of the letter.

A letter of admonition may be issued to a licensee or collections manager whether or not a license or approval has been surrendered prior to issuance.

No person whose license has been revoked shall be licensed again under the terms of this article 16 for five years. No person hired as a collections manager whose approval has been terminated by the administrator for a violation of this article 16 shall be hired again as a collections manager for five years.

The court of appeals shall have jurisdiction to review all final actions and orders that are subject to judicial review of the administrator. Proceedings shall be conducted in accordance with section 24-4-106 (11).

The administrator, expert witnesses, and consultants are immune from civil suit when they perform in good faith any duties in connection with any proceedings authorized under this section. Any person who files a complaint in good faith under this section is immune from civil suit.

Source:

L. 2017:

(12) amended, (SB 17-216), ch. 285, p. 1581, § 10, effective June 1; entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1238), ch. 260, p. 1101, § 1, effective August 9.

5-16-128. Debt collectors for the department of personnel - complaint - disciplinary procedures.

Any interested person may file a written complaint with the executive director of the department of personnel charging a debt collector in the employ of the department of personnel with a violation of:

This article 16 or a rule promulgated pursuant to this article 16;

A lawful order of the state board of ethics; or

The standards of conduct set forth in the code of conduct developed by the department of personnel for such debt collectors.

Each complaint filed pursuant to this section shall be referred to the executive director of the department of personnel who shall conduct an investigation to determine if a violation of subsection (1) of this section occurred. If the executive director makes a determination that a violation did occur, the debt collector who is the subject of the complaint shall be subject to the disciplinary procedures set forth in rules adopted by the state personnel board. If a determination made pursuant to this subsection (2) is unsatisfactory to any party, an appeal may be made to the board of ethics for the executive branch of state government in the office of the governor.

If the executive director of the department of personnel, or the board of ethics in the case of an appeal, makes a determination that a debt collector in the employ of the department of personnel has acted in violation of this article 16 or a rule promulgated pursuant to this article 16, a lawful order of the state board of ethics, or the code of conduct described in subsection (1)(c) of this section, the determination shall be made a part of the personnel file of the debt collector against whom the complaint was filed.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1238), ch. 260, p. 1103, § 1, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-14-130.1 as it existed prior to 2017.

5-16-129. Records.

The administrator shall keep a suitable record of all license applications and bonds required to be filed. The record shall state whether a license has been issued under the application and bond and, if revoked, the date of the filing of the order of revocation. The administrator shall keep a list of each person who has had a license revoked or has been terminated as a collections manager for a violation of this article 16. In the record, all licenses issued shall be indicated by their serial numbers and the names and addresses of the licensees. This section shall apply to renewal applications and renewal licenses. The record shall be open for inspection as a public record in the office of the administrator.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1238), ch. 260, p. 1104, § 1, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-14-131 as it existed prior to 2017.

5-16-130. Jurisdiction of courts.

County courts shall have concurrent jurisdiction with the district courts of this state in all criminal prosecutions for violations of this article 16.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1238), ch. 260, p. 1104, § 1, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-14-132 as it existed prior to 2017.

5-16-131. Duty of district attorney.

It is the duty of the district attorney to prosecute all violations of the provisions of this article 16 occurring within his or her district.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1238), ch. 260, p. 1104, § 1, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-14-133 as it existed prior to 2017.

5-16-132. Remedies.

The remedies provided in this article 16 are in addition to and not exclusive of any other remedies provided by law.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1238), ch. 260, p. 1104, § 1, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-14-134 as it existed prior to 2017.

5-16-133. Injunction - receiver.

The district court in and for the city and county of Denver, upon application of the administrator, may issue an injunction or other appropriate order restraining any person from a violation of this article 16 and may appoint a receiver or award other relief to effectuate the provisions of this article 16; order restitution for consumers or creditors for violations of this article 16; impose civil penalties up to one thousand five hundred dollars per violation of this article 16; and award reasonable costs and attorney fees to the administrator if the administrator prevails in an action brought under this article 16. This provision shall be in addition to any other remedy and shall not prohibit the enforcement of any other law. The administrator shall not be required to show irreparable injury or to post a bond.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1238), ch. 260, p. 1104, § 1, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-14-135 as it existed prior to 2017.

5-16-134. Disposition of fees and fines.

All revenue, except fines, collected pursuant to this article 16 shall be collected by the administrator and transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the collection agency cash fund, which fund is hereby created and referred to in this section as the "fund". The general assembly shall make annual appropriations from the fund for the uses and purposes of this article 16. All revenue credited to the fund, including earned interest, shall be used for the administration and enforcement of this article 16.

Notwithstanding any provision of subsection (1)(a) of this section to the contrary, on March 27, 2002, the state treasurer shall deduct four hundred sixty-two thousand dollars from the fund and transfer such sum to the general fund.

Notwithstanding any provision of subsection (1)(a) of this section to the contrary, on March 5, 2003, the state treasurer shall deduct one hundred twenty thousand dollars from the fund and transfer such sum to the general fund.

All fines collected pursuant to this article 16, including but not limited to fines collected pursuant to section 5-16-127, shall be collected by the administrator and transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the general fund.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1238), ch. 260, p. 1104, § 1, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-14-136 as it existed prior to 2017.

5-16-134.5. Debts sold or resold after January 1, 2018.

This article 16 applies to debt buyers with respect to consumer debts sold or resold on or after January 1, 2018.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire section added, (SB 17-216), ch. 285, p. 1581, § 11, effective June 1.

Editor's note:

This section was numbered as § 12-14-136.5 in SB 17-216 (see L. 2017, p. 1581). That provision was relocated and harmonized with this article as it appears in HB 17-1238.

5-16-135. Repeal of article.

This article 16 is repealed, effective September 1, 2028. Before its repeal, this article 16 is scheduled for review in accordance with section 24-34-104.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire section amended, (SB 17-216), ch. 285, p. 1577, § 2, effective June 1; entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1238), ch. 260, p. 1105, § 1, effective August 9.